District of Columbia statutes.
7-755.04

Commission on Health Disparities Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Commission on Health Disparities Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Commission in accordance with subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

(b)

Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:

(1)

Appropriations;

(2)

Private gifts or donations; and

(3)

Federal grants, when awarded.

(c)

Money in the Fund shall be used to fulfill the functions and duties of the Commission, as set forth in § 7-755.02.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

History

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 192, § 5, 61 DCR 12403